Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-4,110
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 83-4,109 to 83-4,123, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1) Director shall mean the Director of Correctional Services; and

(2) Department shall mean the Department of Correctional Services.

Laws 1976, LB 275, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 52.